Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1604
Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund; created; use; investment.

The Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund is hereby created. The fund shall include the proceeds raised from the documentary stamp tax and remitted for such fund pursuant to section 76-903 and transfers authorized by the Legislature. Money remitted to such fund shall be used by the department (1) for grants to eligible shelter providers as set out in section 68-1605 for the purpose of assisting in the alleviation of homelessness, to provide temporary and permanent shelters for homeless persons, to encourage the development of projects which link housing assistance to programs promoting the concept of self-sufficiency, and to address the needs of the migrant farmworker and (2) to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund Act, which shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars in any fiscal year. Transfers may be made from the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

Any money in the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1192, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 62;

Laws 2001, LB 516, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 28;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 156.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.